Washington statutes.
RCW 4.28.110

Manner of publication and form of summons.

The publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the action is brought once a week for six consecutive weeks: PROVIDED, That publication of summons shall not be made until after the filing of the complaint, and the service of the summons shall be deemed complete at the expiration of the time prescribed for publication. The summons must be subscribed by the plaintiff or his or her attorney or attorneys. The summons shall contain the date of the first publication, and shall require the defendant or defendants upon whom service by publication is desired, to appear and answer the complaint within sixty days from the date of the first publication of the summons; and the summons for publication shall also contain a brief statement of the object of the action. The summons for publication shall be substantially as follows:

In the superior court of the State of Washington for the county of . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . ., Plaintiff,

vs.

No. . . . .

. . . . . . . . ., Defendant.

The State of Washington to the said (naming the defendant or defendants to be served by publication):

You are hereby summoned to appear within sixty days after the date of the first publication of this summons, to wit, within sixty days after the . . . . day of . . . . . ., 1 . . . ., and defend the above entitled action in the above entitled court, and answer the complaint of the plaintiff . . . . . ., and serve a copy of your answer upon the undersigned attorneys for plaintiff . . . . . ., at his (or their) office below stated; and in case of your failure so to do, judgment will be rendered against you according to the demand of the complaint, which has been filed with the clerk of said court. (Insert here a brief statement of the object of the action.)

. . . .,

Plaintiff's Attorneys.

P.O. Address . . . .

County . . . .

Washington.

[ 2011 c 336 s 98; 1985 c 469 s 2; 1895 c 86 s 2; 1893 c 127 s 10; RRS s 233.]

NOTES:

Publication of legal notices: Chapter 65.16 RCW.